Utah statutes.
59-12-204.   Sales and use tax ordinance provisions -- Tax rate --
Distribution of tax revenues -- Commission requirement to retain an amount to
be deposited into the Qualified Emergency Food Agencies Fund.
(1)  The tax ordinance adopted pursuant to this part shall impose a tax upon
those transactions listed in Subsection 59-12-103(1).
(2) (a)  The tax ordinance under Subsection (1) shall include a provision
imposing a tax upon every transaction listed in Subsection 59-12-103(1) made
within a county, including areas contained within the cities and towns located
in the county:
(i)  at the rate of 1% of the purchase price paid or charged; and
(ii)  if the transaction is consummated within the county in accordance with
Section 59-12-205.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(a), a tax ordinance under this Subsection
(2) shall include a provision prohibiting a county, city, or town from
imposing a tax under this section on the sales and uses described in Section
59-12-104 to the extent the sales and uses are exempt from taxation under
Section 59-12-104.
(3)  Such tax ordinance shall include provisions substantially the same as
those contained in Part 1, Tax Collection, insofar as they relate to sales or
use tax, except that the name of the county as the taxing agency shall be
substituted for that of the state where necessary for the purpose of this part
and that an additional license is not required if one has been or is issued
under Section 59-12-106.
(4)  Such tax ordinance shall include a provision that the county shall
contract, prior to the effective date of the ordinance, with the commission to
perform all functions incident to the administration or operation of the
ordinance.
(5)  Such tax ordinance shall include a provision that the sale, storage, use,
or other consumption of tangible personal property, the purchase price or the
cost of which has been subject to sales or use tax under a sales and use tax
ordinance enacted in accordance with this part by any county, city, or town in
any other county in this state, shall be exempt from the tax due under this
ordinance.
(6)  Such tax ordinance shall include a provision that any person subject to
the provisions of a city or town sales and use tax shall be exempt from the
county sales and use tax if the city or town sales and use tax is levied under
an ordinance including provisions in substance as follows:
(a)  a provision imposing a tax upon every transaction listed in Subsection
59-12-103(1) made within the city or town at the rate imposed by the county in
which it is situated pursuant to Subsection (2);
(b)  notwithstanding Subsection (2)(a), a provision prohibiting the city or
town from imposing a tax under this section on the sales and uses described in
Section 59-12-104 to the extent the sales and uses are exempt from taxation
under Section 59-12-104;
(c)  provisions substantially the same as those contained in Part 1, Tax
Collection, insofar as they relate to sales and use taxes, except that the
name of the city or town as the taxing agency shall be substituted for that of
the state where necessary for the purposes of this part;
(d)  a provision that the city or town shall contract prior to the effective
date of the city or town sales and use tax ordinance with the commission to
perform all functions incident to the administration or operation of the sales
and use tax ordinance of the city or town;
(e)  a provision that the sale, storage, use, or other consumption of tangible
personal property, the gross receipts from the sale of or the cost of which
has been subject to sales or use tax under a sales and use tax ordinance
enacted in accordance with this part by any county other than the county in
which the city or town is located, or city or town in this state, shall be
exempt from the tax; and
(f)  a provision that the amount of any tax paid under Part 1, Tax Collection,
shall not be included as a part of the purchase price paid or charged for a
taxable item.
(7)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, beginning July 1,
2000, the commission shall:
(a)  determine and retain the portion of sales and use tax imposed under this
section:
(i)  by each county and by each city and town within that county whose
legislative body consents by resolution to the commission's retaining and
depositing sales and use tax revenues as provided in this Subsection (7); and
(ii)  that is equal to the revenues generated by a 1/64% tax rate;
(b)  deposit the revenues described in Subsection (7)(a) into a special fund
of the county, or a city, town, or other political subdivision of the state
located within that county, that has issued bonds to finance sports or
recreational facilities or that is leasing sports or recreational facilities,
in order to repay those bonds or to pay the lease payments; and
(c)  continue to deposit those revenues into the special fund only as long as
the bonds or leases are outstanding.
(8) (a)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, beginning on
July 1, 2009, the commission shall calculate and retain a portion of the sales
and use tax collected under this part as provided in this Subsection (8).
(b)  For a city, town, or unincorporated area of a county that imposes a tax
under this part, the commission shall calculate a percentage each month by
dividing the sales and use tax collected under this part for that month within
the boundaries of that city, town, or unincorporated area of a county by the
total sales and use tax collected under this part for that month within the
boundaries of all of the cities, towns, and unincorporated areas of the
counties that impose a tax under this part.
(c)  For a city, town, or unincorporated area of a county that imposes a tax
under this part, the commission shall retain each month an amount equal to the
product of:
(i)  the percentage the commission determines for the month under Subsection
(8)(b) for the city, town, or unincorporated area of a county; and
(ii)  $25,417.
(d)  The commission shall deposit an amount the commission retains in
accordance with this Subsection (8) into the Qualified Emergency Food Agencies
Fund created by Section 9-4-1409.
(e)  An amount the commission deposits into the Qualified Emergency Food
Agencies Fund shall be expended as provided in Section 9-4-1409.
